Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.250

Nursing homes without violations—Public agencies notified—Priority.

On or before February 1st of each year, the department shall notify all public agencies which refer patients to nursing homes of all of the nursing homes in the area found upon inspection within the previous twelve-month period to be without violations. Public agencies shall give priority to such nursing homes in referring publicly assisted patients.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 12.]